Washington statutes.
RCW 6.01.010

Application of chapters in Title 6 RCW to superior courts and district courts—Definitions.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, the provisions of this chapter and of chapters 6.13, 6.15, 6.17, 6.19, 6.21, 6.25, 6.26, and 6.27 RCW and chapter 6.32 RCW apply to both the superior courts and district courts of this state. If proceedings are before a district court, acts to be performed by the clerk may be performed by a district court judge if there is no clerk. As used in this title, "sheriff" includes deputies, and "execution docket" refers also to the docket of a district court.

[ 1987 c 442 s 101.]